Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-313
Rules and regulations; traffic; violation; penalty.

The commission, with regard to roads on any area under its ownership or control, may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations deemed necessary as authorized by sections 60-680 and 60-6,190. Any person guilty of a violation of the rules and regulations established under the authority of sections 60-680 and 60-6,190 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 71.